Missouri, session 2026, HB2847.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 89.060, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 89.060, to read as follows:
89.060. 1. Such regulations, restrictions, and boundaries may from time to time be
amended, supplemented, changed, modified, or repealed. In case, however, of a protest
against such change duly signed and acknowledged by the owners of thirty percent or more,
either of the areas of the land (exclusive of streets and alleys) included in such proposed
change or within an area determined by lines drawn parallel to and one hundred and eighty-
five feet distant from the boundaries of the district proposed to be changed, such amendment
shall not become effective except by the favorable vote of two-thirds of all the members of
the legislative body of such municipality. The provisions of section 89.050 relative to public
hearing and official notice shall apply equally to all changes or amendments.
2. (1) No charter provision or order or ordinance adopted by a city shall allow,
permit, or authorize a challenge, protest, contest, or repeal of any changes or
amendments to such regulations, restrictions, or boundaries by a referendum, initiative,
or vote of the residents or citizens of such city.
(2) No city shall adopt, enact, or enforce a charter provision, order, ordinance,
law, regulation, or other provision having force and effect of law that permits any
challenge to any proposed change or amendment to such regulations, restrictions, or
boundaries except as provided in subsection 1 of this section.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2847 2
(3) This subsection shall apply only to any home rule city partially located in any
county with more than two hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred
thousand inhabitants.
✔